Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2479.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 42-28.6 of the General Laws entitled "Law Enforcement Officers’
Due Process, Accountability, and Transparency Act" is hereby amended by adding thereto the
following section:
42-28.6-19. Prohibition against hiring immigration and customs (I.C.E.) officers.
(a) A law enforcement agency, as defined by § 42-164-2, shall not employ any
individual who was hired as a sworn officer of the United States Immigration and Customs
Enforcement Agency on or after January 20, 2025.
(b) This section applies prospectively only and does not apply to any individual
hired by the agency prior to the effective date of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on October 1, 2026
========
LC004600
========